Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Jurisdiction, Powers, and Duties Generally

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization of Commission, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-1-1.

46-2-20.
Jurisdiction of commission generally; powers and duties of commission generally.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the commission shall have the general supervision of all common carriers, express companies, railroad or street railroad companies, dock or wharfage companies, terminal or terminal station companies, telephone companies, gas or electric light and power companies, and persons or private companies who operate rapid rail passenger service lines within this state; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to extend the jurisdiction of the commission to include the operations of the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority created in an Act approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended.

The commission may hear complaints; in addition, it is also authorized to perform the duties imposed upon it of its own initiative.

The commission may, either by general rules or by special orders in particular cases, require all companies under its supervision to establish and maintain such public services and facilities as may be reasonable and just.

The commission may require common carriers and persons or private companies who operate rapid rail passenger service lines to publish their schedules in newspapers of towns through which their lines extend, in such manner as may be reasonable and as the public convenience demands.

The commission shall have authority to examine the affairs of all companies under its supervision and to keep informed as to their general condition, their capitalization, their franchises, and the manner in which the lines owned, leased, or controlled by them are managed, conducted, and operated, not only with respect to the adequacy, security, and accommodation afforded by their service to the public and their employees but also with reference to their compliance with all laws, orders of the commission, and charter requirements.

The commission shall have the power and authority, whenever it deems advisable, to prescribe, establish, and order a uniform system of accounts to be used by railroads and other companies over which it has jurisdiction, the same to be, as far as practicable, in conformity with the system of accounts prescribed by the Interstate Commerce Commission. The commission shall also have the power and authority to examine all books, contracts, records, papers, and documents of any person subject to its supervision and to compel the production thereof.

The commission shall have the power, through any of its members, at its discretion, to make personal visits to the offices and places of business of the companies under its supervision for the purpose of examination. Any Commissioner making a personal visit pursuant to this subsection shall have full power and authority to examine the agents and employees of any such company, under oath or otherwise, in order to procure information deemed by the Commissioner necessary to the work of the commission or of value to the public.

Nothing in this Code section shall be so construed as to repeal or abrogate any existing law or rule of the commission as to notice or hearings to be accorded to any person interested in the rates fixed by, or in the orders, rules, or regulations promulgated by, the commission before the same are issued. Neither shall anything in this Code section repeal the law of this state as to notice by publication of a change in rates.

The commission shall have the power and authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the safe installation and safe operation of all natural gas transmission and distribution facilities within this state, including, without limitation, all natural gas transmission and distribution facilities which are owned and operated by municipalities within this state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority and jurisdiction of the commission shall not extend to persons or companies who are engaged in the retail sale of natural gas to the public for use as a fuel in motor vehicles and who are not otherwise subject to the authority and jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 2663; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, §§ 3, 5; Code 1933, § 93-307; Ga. L. 1967, p. 650, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 692, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1647, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 3/HB 1115.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “and telegraph” following “telephone” near the middle of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Authority of commission to promulgate safety rules and regulations for motor vehicles within its jurisdiction, §

40-8-2

.

Authority of commission to contract with state agencies to use state employees, § 45-10-20.

Jurisdiction of commission with regard to projects of Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, §

46-3-152

.

Rapid Rail Passenger Service, Chapter 8A, Title 46.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code section 28-9-5, in 1989, a comma was inserted following “promulgated by” in subsection (h).

Law reviews.

For article, “The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia’s Administrative Law,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012).

46-2-21.
Extension of commission’s powers and duties to street railroads, telegraph companies, telephone companies, and gas and electric light and power companies.

The powers and duties conferred by law prior to August 23, 1907, upon the commission and its authority and control shall extend to street railroads and to companies owning, leasing, or operating street railroads in this state, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to impair any valid contract between any municipality and any such company in force on that date; provided, further, that this Code section shall not operate to repeal any municipal ordinance existing on that date; nor shall it impair or invalidate any contract or ordinance of any municipality made or adopted since that date as to the public uses of such company, which contract or ordinance has received the assent of the commission.

The powers and duties conferred by law prior to August 23, 1907, upon the commission and its authority and control shall also extend to:

Docks and wharves, and companies owning, leasing, or operating the same;

Terminals or terminal stations, and companies owning, leasing, or operating the same;

Cotton compress corporations or associations, and companies owning, leasing, or operating the same;

Telegraph or telephone companies, or persons owning, leasing, or operating a public telephone service or telephone lines in this state; and

Gas and electric light and power companies, or persons owning, leasing, or operating public gas plants or electric light and power plants furnishing service to the public.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 5; Ga. L. 1908, p. 67, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2662; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 1; Code 1933, § 93-304.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

46-2-22.
[Reserved] Jurisdiction of commission over express companies and telegraph companies.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 151, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2217; Civil Code 1910, § 2660; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 1; Code 1933, § 93-305; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 4/HB 1115, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 4/HB 1115 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2012.

46-2-23.
Rate-making power of commission generally; special provisions concerning telecommunications companies.

The commission shall have exclusive power to determine what are just and reasonable rates and charges to be made by any person, firm, or corporation subject to its jurisdiction.

As to those telecommunications companies subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, the commission is not required to fix and determine specific rates, tariffs, or charges for the services offered by said telecommunications companies and in lieu thereof may on application of an interested party or on its own motion after public notice and hearing:

Totally deregulate a service;

Totally eliminate any tariffs on a service;

Eliminate tariff rates for a service but retain tariffs for service standards and requirements; or

Eliminate tariff rates for a service but require that notice of any rate changes be provided to the commission.

In determining what actions, if any, are to be taken on applications under subsection (b) of this Code section, the commission shall conduct hearings at which it shall consider the following factors:

The extent to which competing telecommunications services are available from competitive providers in the relevant geographic market;

The ability of competitive providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services readily available;

The number and size of competitive providers of service;

The overall impact of the proposed regulatory change on the continued availability of existing services at just and reasonable rates;

The impact of the proposed regulatory change upon efforts to promote universal availability of basic telecommunications services at affordable rates and to permit telecommunications companies subject to the jurisdiction of the commission to respond to competitive thrusts; and

Such other factors as the commission may determine are in the public interest.

Nothing in this Code section shall authorize the application of subsection (b) of this Code section to any service unless functionally equivalent or substitute services are readily available from competitive providers in the relevant geographic market. This finding must be made on the record after public hearing.

Any telecommunications service deregulated or detariffed under this Code section may be reregulated or resubjected to tariffing by the commission if the commission finds, through a proceeding initiated on its own or upon application by an interested party, that such reregulation or retariffing is in the public interest.

Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted as requiring the commission to alter, amend, or repeal any rule or regulation which relates to any telecommunications company and which has been adopted by the commission or which is under consideration for adoption by the commission as of April 14, 1988.

No telecommunications company may use current revenues earned or expenses incurred in conjunction with services subject to regulation to subsidize services which are not regulated or tariffed. The commission may adopt procedural rules as necessary to implement this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1988, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 46; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, §§ 12, 15/HB 117; Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 5/HB 1115.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted former subsection (h), which read: “Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted as amending, modifying, altering, or repealing Chapter 6 of this title, known as the ‘Georgia Radio Utility Act.’ ” and redesignated former subsection (i) as present subsection (h).

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 30, 2009, in subsection (h), substituted “House Energy, Utilities and Telecommunications Committee” for “Industry Committee of the House of Representatives” and substituted “Senate Regulated Industries and Utilities Committee” for “Finance and Public Utilities Committee of the Senate”. See Editor’s notes for intent.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted former subsection (h), which read: “Beginning one year after deregulation or eliminating tariffs on a service, the utility will file within 60 days of such anniversary date with the commission a report showing the rates or tariffs for such service on the effective date of deregulation or detariffing and the rates or tariffs on the anniversary date. Such reports will continue to be filed on an updated basis annually for a period of five years. The commission may prescribe the form and content of such reports. The commission will thereafter as soon as practicable file a summary of the results and contents of such reports with the House Energy, Utilities and Telecommunications Committee and the Senate Regulated Industries and Utilities Committee.”

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against gratuities, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “April 14, 1988” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” at the end of subsection (f) and subsections (f.1) and (g) were redesignated as subsections (g) and (h), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 55, repealed Ga. L. 1988, p. 1988, § 2, providing for certain reports after deregulation or elimination of tariffs on a service. These provisions may now be found in subsection (h) of this Code section.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2009).

46-2-23.1.
“Alternative form of regulation” defined; filing; notice; approval; release of interstate pipeline capacity.

As used in this Code section, the term “alternative form of regulation” means a method of establishing just and reasonable rates and charges for a gas company by performance based regulation without regard to methods based strictly upon cost of service, rate base, and rate of return. Performance based regulation may include without limitation one or more of the following features: earnings sharing, price caps, price-indexing formulas, ranges of authorized rates of return, and the reduction or suspension of regulatory requirements.

A gas company may from time to time file an application with the commission to have its rates, charges, classifications, and services regulated under an alternative form of regulation. Within ten days of the filing, the gas company shall publish a notice generally describing the application in a newspaper or newspapers with general circulation in its service territory.

After notice and hearing the commission may approve the plan, or approve it with modifications, if the commission determines that the application is in the public interest and will produce just and reasonable rates, after taking into consideration the extent to which the application:

Is designed to and is likely to produce lower prices for consumers of natural gas in Georgia;

Will provide incentives for the gas company to lower its costs and rates;

Will provide incentives to improve the efficiency and productivity of the gas company;

Will foster the long-term provision of natural gas service in a manner that will improve the quality and choices of service;

Is consistent with maintenance and enhancement of safe, adequate, and reliable service and will maintain or improve preexisting service quality and consumer protection safeguards;

Will not result in cross-subsidization among or between groups of gas company customers;

Will not result in cross-subsidization among or between the portion of the gas company’s business or operations subject to the alternative form of regulation and any unregulated portion of the business or operations of the gas company or of any of its affiliates;

Will reduce regulatory delay and cost; and

Will tend to enhance economic activity in the affected service territory.

Performance based regulation adopted by the commission as an alternative form of regulation shall provide for the following:

Equal and symmetric opportunities to earn above and below the performance standard;

Performance incentives based upon conditions within the control of the management of the gas company; and

Adjustments from time to time for the net effect of changes in tax rates, other costs imposed by law, and the cost of capital.

Where an application for an alternative form of regulation has been filed by a gas company and the commission determines that the proposal does not satisfy the requirements of this Code section, it may either reject the proposal or issue an order approving an alternative with such modifications as the commission deems necessary to satisfy the requirements of this Code section. The commission shall determine and prescribe in any such order establishing rates and charges the revenue requirements of the gas company filing the application.

An order adopting an alternative form of regulation may include:

Terms and conditions for establishing new services, withdrawing services, price changes to services, and services by contract to individual customers;

Terms and conditions necessary to achieve the objectives contained in subsection (c) of this Code section;

General or specific authorization for changes in rates, charges, classifications, or services such that the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-2-25 do not require 30 days’ notice and commission approval before such change or changes may go into effect; and

Other rates, terms, and conditions that are consistent with the objectives and requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the provisions of this title relating to the rates, charges, and terms of service of a gas company shall apply to rates, charges, and terms of service established pursuant to this Code section.

Any special or negotiated contract between a gas company and a retail customer approved by the commission shall not be invalidated or modified by the provisions of this Code section.

Neither the provisions of this Code section nor the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 4 of this title shall prohibit a gas company from releasing interstate pipeline capacity available to it from time to time and not required to serve the requirements of its retail customers and marketers and from making sales of gas with or without interstate transportation capacity to municipal corporations, other local gas distribution companies, or marketers and end users connected to an interstate pipeline company or connected to another local distribution company; provided, however, that where net benefits to the firm retail customers who are receiving commodity sales service from the gas company accrue:

Twenty percent of the revenues from the release of interstate pipeline capacity for the purposes of transporting gas to end users in Georgia shall be allocated to the gas company, and the remaining 80 percent of such revenues shall be credited to the costs of gas sold by the gas company to firm retail customers;

Ten percent of the revenues from the release of interstate pipeline capacity for the purpose of transporting gas to end users outside of Georgia shall be allocated to the gas company, and the remaining 90 percent of such revenues shall be credited to the costs of gas sold by the gas company to firm retail customers; and

Fifty percent of the net margin from the sale of gas, with or without interstate capacity, to municipal corporations, other local gas distribution companies, or marketers and end users connected to an interstate pipeline company or connected to another local distribution company shall be allocated to the gas company, and the remaining 50 percent of such net margins shall be credited to the costs of gas sold by the gas company to firm retail customers; provided, however, that if as a result of such sale, the then existing natural gas requirements of retail customers in Georgia cannot be supplied physically, all of such net margin shall be credited to the costs of gas. The net margin shall be calculated by subtracting all variable costs associated with the transaction from the revenues generated by the transaction. The costs recovered by the gas company through such transactions shall be credited to the gas costs payable by retail customers of the gas company.

Where a universal service fund has been created by the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-4-161 for a gas company which is an electing distribution company, as defined in paragraph (10) of Code Section 46-4-152, the shares that are to be credited to the costs of gas sold to firm retail customers under subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be allocated to such fund, and the costs recovered through a transaction described in subparagraph (C) of this subsection shall be allocated to such company.

Any gas company which engages in a transaction of a type described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, which results in the allocation to the gas company of a share of the revenues or net margin therefrom, shall make a report to the commission annually describing each such transaction and explaining the benefits resulting to firm retail customers from each such transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-23.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 35/SB 148.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted the former last sentence of paragraph (i)(3), which read: “Such report shall be served on the consumer’s utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs.”

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 264 (1997).

46-2-24.
Consideration by commission of quality of service in determining just and reasonable rates and charges.

In determining what are just and reasonable rates and charges to be made by any person, firm, or corporation (referred to in this Code section as a “utility”) subject to its jurisdiction, the commission is authorized and is directed to consider the quality of the service rendered by such utility.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-309.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 677, § 1.

Cross references.

Limitation on authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-2-25.
Procedure for changing any rate, charge, classification, or service; recovery of financing costs.

No person, firm, or corporation (referred to in this Code section as a “utility”) subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall make any change in any rate, charge, classification, or service subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, or in any rule or regulation relating thereto, except after 30 days’ notice to the commission and to the public, unless the commission otherwise orders, or unless the commission has previously authorized or approved the change. Such notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection new schedules stating plainly the changes to be made in the schedules then in force and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes to take effect without requiring the 30 days’ notice by an order specifying the changes to be made, the time when they shall take effect, and the manner in which they shall be filed and published.

Whenever any new schedule is filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the commission shall have authority, either upon written complaint or upon its own initiative without complaint, at once, and, if it so orders, without answer or formal pleading by the utility but upon reasonable notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning the lawfulness of such rate, charge, classification, or service. Pending such hearing and the decision thereon, the commission, upon filing with such schedule and delivering to the utility affected thereby a statement in writing of its reasons for such suspension, may suspend the operation of such schedule and defer the use of such rate, charge, classification, or service, but not for a period longer than five months beyond the time when it would otherwise go into effect, provided that the commission may apply to the Superior Court of Fulton County for an extension of such period, as provided for in Code Section 46-2-57. After such hearings as are required, whether they are completed before or after the rate, charge, classification, or service goes into effect, the commission may make such orders as are proper with reference thereto within the authority vested in the commission. The commission is empowered to reduce or revoke any such suspension with respect to all or any part of such schedule. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order not made at the expiration of the suspension period, the proposed change of rate, charge, classification, or service shall go into effect at the end of such period; but in case of a proposed increased rate or charge, the commission shall by order require the interested utility to keep accurate account in detail of all amounts received by reason of such increase, specifying by whom and in whose behalf such amounts were paid; and upon completion of the hearing and the rendering of a decision, the commission shall by further order require such utility to refund, with interest at the maximum legal rate, in such manner as the commission may direct, such portion of such increased rates or charges as by its decision shall be found not justified. Any portion of such refunds not thus refunded to patrons or customers of the utility shall be refunded or disposed of by the utility as the commission may direct, provided that no such funds shall accrue to the benefit of the utility. At any hearing involving a rate or charge sought to be increased, the burden of proof to show that the increased rate or charge is just and reasonable shall be upon the utility, and the commission shall give to the hearing and decision of such questions preference over other questions pending before it and decide the same as speedily as possible.

Before any increased rate or charge shall go into effect without the approval of the commission, the commission shall by order require the interested utility to file with the commission a bond written by a surety who is approved by the commission and who is authorized to transact business in this state. The bond shall be fixed by the commission in an amount not to exceed $250,000.00. The bond shall be payable to the Governor and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements of the refund order entered by the commission, the requirements of this Code section, and the requirements of the rules and regulations of the commission.

(c.1) (1)

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a utility shall recover from its customers, as provided in this subsection, the costs of financing associated with the construction of a nuclear generating plant which has been certified by the commission prior to January 1, 2018. The financing charges shall accrue on all applicable certified costs as they are recorded in the utility’s construction work in progress accounts pursuant to generally accepted accounting and regulatory principles as approved by the commission. The financing costs shall be based on the utility’s actual cost of debt, as reflected in its annual surveillance report filed with the commission, and based on the authorized cost of equity capital and capital structure as determined by the commission when setting the utility’s current base rates. These financing costs shall be recovered from each customer through a separate rate tariff and allocated on an equal percentage basis to standard base tariffs which are designed to collect embedded capacity costs. The commission shall retain the discretion to consider the effect of this tariff when setting the level of any senior or low income assistance it may authorize; provided, however, that the income qualification for such assistance shall be 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

Any action taken by the commission under this Code section shall be reduced to writing by the commission and signed by the chairman and secretary thereof. All such actions and orders shall be effective from the date such actions are reduced to writing and are signed as provided by this subsection. No such action or order of the commission may be given retroactive effect. A full and complete record shall be kept of the votes taken in connection with any such action, said record to be entered upon the official minutes of the commission.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting the authority granted to the commission by Code Sections 46-2-20 and 46-2-23 to initiate an earnings review hearing.

(2)

The commission shall have the authority to authorize any specific accounting treatment for the costs recovered pursuant to this subsection and to review whether costs recovered pursuant to this subsection are being properly recorded.

(3) (A)

For any nuclear generating plant certified by the commission on or after July 1, 2009, the utility may begin recovering the costs of financing the construction of the nuclear generating plant at any time within five years after the date on which such nuclear generating plant is certified. Any such costs incurred between the time the plant is certified and the time the utility begins recovering its cost shall be accrued, capitalized, and included in the balance of the account and then amortized over the next five years following the date on which the utility begins recovering the costs of financing the construction and shall be recovered with one-fifth of those deferred costs being recovered each year for five years.

(B)

For any nuclear generating plant certified by the commission on or after January 1, 2009, and before July 1, 2009, the utility shall begin recovering on January 1, 2011, any costs of financing the construction of the nuclear generating plant. Any such costs incurred prior to January 1, 2011, shall be accrued, capitalized, and included in the balance of the account and then amortized over the next five years following January 1, 2011, and shall be recovered with one-fifth of those deferred costs being recovered each year for five years.

(4)

The costs recoverable pursuant to this subsection shall be recalculated and the level of the charges reset annually if necessary to reflect the level of construction costs expected to be incurred in the next 12 months consistent with the certificate and the financing costs expected to be incurred for the next 12 months together with a balanced accounting of actual expenditures and financing costs incurred in the preceding period.

(5)

The financing costs associated with a nuclear generating plant which has been certified by the commission shall continue to be recovered between the time that the generating plant begins commercial operation and until the next general rate case filed by the utility becomes effective, at which time the financing costs being collected for any generating plants which are then in commercial operation shall be included in the general revenue requirements of the utility and collected in the general base rates of the utility.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-307.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 137, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 419, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 39, § 2/SB 31; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1085, § 1/SB 355.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, added subsection (e).

The 2009 amendment,

effective April 21, 2009, added subsection (c.1).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added “prior to January 1, 2018” at the end of the first sentence of paragraph (c.1)(1).

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against gratuities, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 39, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Nuclear Energy Financing Act.’”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 285 (2002).

46-2-25.1.
County-wide local calling; modification of existing rate schedules; plans for implementing service; methods of funding; rate-making power of commission not affected.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, on and after July 1, 1990, the commission shall not approve any rate schedule which authorizes a long-distance charge for calls between two telephones within the same county. Where two or more telephone companies operate in the same county, each company shall provide county-wide local calling to and from telephones within the area served by the other company or companies in the county. Rate schedules approved prior to July 1, 1990, shall be amended to comply with this Code section by not later than July 1, 1991.

All rate schedules approved pursuant to this Code section may be modified at the discretion of the commission upon a good and sufficient showing of geographic, economic, or technological infeasibility by a telephone company.

All rate schedules approved pursuant to this Code section shall take into account the following:

The reasonable cost of providing such service to customers of the telephone company throughout the entire service area of such telephone company and the increased value resulting from such expanded calling areas;

The average annual contributions made by such telephone company to the intra-LATA toll pool if such pool exists; and

The reasonable rate of return on investment authorized in the rate schedule approved by the commission for such telephone company.

The commission shall, on or before December 31, 1990, implement a plan whereby all telephone companies subject to its jurisdiction will provide to each telephone subscriber, in addition to its present service arrangements and the intracounty service mandated under the provisions of this Code section, expanded community of interest toll free calling beyond county boundary lines and/or a reduction in intra-LATA toll rates to a level comparable to present inter-LATA toll rates.

Any plan to implement county-wide local calling shall be subject to the approval of the commission. In developing a plan, the commission shall require telephone companies to enter into negotiations to provide for county-wide local calling throughout their service areas. If the companies are unable to reach an agreement within a time frame consistent with the requirements of this Code section and the instructions of the commission, the commission may impose its own plan. The commission shall have the authority to determine the method of funding this service. In determining the method of funding this service, the commission shall first utilize any available earnings of the telephone companies in excess of those authorized in their respective tariffs; provided, however, that the commission shall not mandate any plan that requires the transfer of funds to implement county-wide local calling from one telephone company to another unless or until all other remedies are exhausted. Any telephone company seeking to recover any portion of its expenses or lost toll revenues resulting from the implementation of such county-wide local calling plan shall demonstrate its financial hardship to the commission before such recovery shall be allowed. It shall be within the discretion of the commission to determine the methodology and source of recovery for any such affected telephone company. Such methodology and source may include, but not be limited to, increases in the affected telephone company’s rates and charges, sharing of lost revenues and increased expenses by any other telephone company included in the plan under review, and any other methodology which has as its goal the maintenance of reasonable telephone rates for all subscribers in the state.

The commission shall be authorized to consider and adopt alternative forms of regulation for telephone companies which may include, but will not be limited to, establishing plans which require the sharing with its subscribers of telephone company earnings above preestablished levels or regulating the maximum prices of basic local exchange services for which there are no readily available substitutes. In determining what actions, if any, are to be taken under this subsection, the commission shall consider the factors contained in subsection (c) of Code Section 46-2-23.

Nothing in this Code section shall be interpreted as amending, modifying, or repealing Code Section 46-2-23, relating to the rate-making power of the commission generally and special provisions concerning telecommunications companies.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1672, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section §

28-9-5

, in 1991, “Code section” was substituted for “Code Section” near the beginning of subsection (g).

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 enactment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 352 (1990).